dictionaries/isv_cyr_hunspell_dict.aff
FLAG long
SFX GC Y 80
SFX GC ти л .
SFX GC ти ла .
SFX GC ти ло .
SFX GC ти ли .
SFX GC скакати у .
SFX GC скакати ем .
SFX GC скакати еш .
SFX GC скакати е .
SFX GC скакати емо .
SFX GC скакати ете .
SFX GC скакати ут .
SFX GC ти х .
SFX GC ти ше .
SFX GC ти хмо .
SFX GC ти сте .
SFX GC ти ху .
SFX GC скакати ј .
SFX GC скакати јмо .
SFX GC скакати јте .
SFX GC скакати јучи .
SFX GC скакати јучего .
SFX GC скакати јучему .
SFX GC скакати јучим .
SFX GC скакати јучем .
SFX GC скакати јучих .
SFX GC скакати јучими .
SFX GC скакати јуча .
SFX GC скакати јучу .
SFX GC скакати јучеј .
SFX GC скакати јучеју .
SFX GC скакати јуче .
SFX GC скакати емы .
SFX GC скакати емого .
SFX GC скакати емому .
SFX GC скакати емым .
SFX GC скакати емом .
SFX GC скакати емо .
SFX GC скакати ема .
SFX GC скакати ему .
SFX GC скакати емој .
SFX GC скакати емоју .
SFX GC скакати еми .
SFX GC скакати еме .
SFX GC скакати емых .
SFX GC скакати емым .
SFX GC скакати емыми .
SFX GC ти вши .
SFX GC ти вшего .
SFX GC ти вшему .
SFX GC ти вшим .
SFX GC ти вшем .
SFX GC ти вших .
SFX GC ти вшими .
SFX GC ти вша .
SFX GC ти вшу .
SFX GC ти вшеј .
SFX GC ти вшеју .
SFX GC ти вше .
SFX GC ти ны .
SFX GC ти ного .
SFX GC ти ному .
SFX GC ти ным .
SFX GC ти ном .
SFX GC ти ни .
SFX GC ти не .
SFX GC ти ных .
SFX GC ти ными .
SFX GC ти на .
SFX GC ти ну .
SFX GC ти ној .
SFX GC ти ноју .
SFX GC ти но .
SFX GC ти нје/xPxE .
SFX GC ти нја/xPxE .
SFX GC ти нју/xPxE .
SFX GC ти нјем/xPxE .
SFX GC ти ниј/xPxE .
SFX GC ти нјам/xPxE .
SFX GC ти нјами/xPxE .
SFX GC ти нјах/xPxE .
